Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 DRIVERS' LICENSES
42-2-106. Instruction permits and temporary licenses.

A person who is sixteen years of age or older and who, except for the person's lack of instruction in operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, would otherwise be qualified to obtain a license under this article may apply for a temporary instruction permit in accordance with sections 42-2-107 and 42-2-108. The department shall issue a permit entitling an applicant, who is sixteen years of age or older but under eighteen years of age, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon the highways when accompanied by the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who signed the affidavit of liability pursuant to section 42-2-108 (1)(a), who holds a valid Colorado driver's license, and who occupies the front seat in close proximity to the driver or, in the case of a motorcycle, under the immediate proximate supervision of a licensed driver, who holds a valid Colorado driver's license and is twenty-one years of age or older, authorized under this article to drive a motorcycle. In addition, the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who is authorized pursuant to this section to supervise the minor driver while the minor is driving, may allow the minor, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, to drive with an individual who holds a valid driver's license and is twenty-one years of age or older for additional driving experience, but such additional driving experience shall not count toward the requirement established in section 42-2-104. The permit shall expire three years after issuance. The department shall issue a permit entitling the applicant, who is eighteen years of age or older, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon the highways when accompanied by a driver, who holds a valid Colorado driver's license and is twenty-one years of age or older, who occupies the front seat of the motor vehicle, or if the vehicle is a motorcycle under the immediate proximate supervision of a driver, who is authorized under this article to drive a motorcycle. The permit shall expire three years after issuance.
(1) (a) (I) A person who is sixteen years of age or older and who, except for the person's lack of instruction in operating a motor vehicle or motorcycle, would otherwise be qualified to obtain a license under this article may apply for a temporary instruction permit in accordance with sections 42-2-107 and 42-2-108. The department shall issue a permit entitling an applicant, who is sixteen years of age or older but under eighteen years of age, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon the highways when accompanied by the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who signed the affidavit of liability pursuant to section 42-2-108 (1)(a), who holds a valid Colorado driver's license, and who occupies the front seat in close proximity to the driver or, in the case of a motorcycle, under the immediate proximate supervision of a licensed driver, who holds a valid Colorado driver's license and is twenty-one years of age or older, authorized under this article to drive a motorcycle. In addition, the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who is authorized pursuant to this section to supervise the minor driver while the minor is driving, may allow the minor, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, to drive with an individual who holds a valid driver's license and is twenty-one years of age or older for additional driving experience, but such additional driving experience shall not count toward the requirement established in section 42-2-104. The permit shall expire three years after issuance. The department shall issue a permit entitling the applicant, who is eighteen years of age or older, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon the highways when accompanied by a driver, who holds a valid Colorado driver's license and is twenty-one years of age or older, who occupies the front seat of the motor vehicle, or if the vehicle is a motorcycle under the immediate proximate supervision of a driver, who is authorized under this article to drive a motorcycle. The permit shall expire three years after issuance.

If the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who signed the affidavit of liability pursuant to section 42-2-108 (1)(a), does not hold a valid Colorado driver's license, the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent may appoint an alternate permit supervisor. An alternate permit supervisor shall hold a valid Colorado driver's license and be twenty-one years of age or older or, if the vehicle is a motorcycle, is authorized under this article to drive a motorcycle. A minor who is issued a permit under this paragraph (a) may drive a motor vehicle, including a motorcycle, under the supervision of the alternate permit supervisor if the minor has the permit in the minor's immediate possession and the alternate permit supervisor occupies the front seat of the motor vehicle or, if the vehicle is a motorcycle, is in close proximity to the driver.

If the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who signed the affidavit of liability pursuant to section 42-2-108 (1)(a), does not hold a valid Colorado driver's license but holds a valid driver's license from another state and is authorized to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle and has proper military identification, then the applicant, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, shall be authorized to drive a motor vehicle, including a motorcycle, under the supervision of the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who cosigned the application for the minor's instruction permit, if the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent occupies the front seat of the motor vehicle or, if the vehicle is a motorcycle, is in close proximity to the driver while the minor is driving.

A minor who is fifteen years of age or older and has completed a department-approved driver education course within the last six months may apply for a minor's instruction permit, pursuant to sections 42-2-107 and 42-2-108. Nothing in this subparagraph (I) shall require a minor who is fifteen years of age or older and in the foster care system to complete and present an affidavit of liability to register for a department-approved driver education course prior to applying for a minor's instruction permit. Upon presentation of a written or printed statement signed by the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent and the instructor of the driver education course that the minor has passed an approved driver education course, and a signed affidavit of liability pursuant to section 42-2-108, the department shall issue the permit entitling the applicant, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, to drive a motor vehicle, including a motorcycle, under the supervision of the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who cosigned the application for the minor's instruction permit, if the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent holds a valid Colorado driver's license and occupies the front seat of the motor vehicle or, if the vehicle is a motorcycle, is authorized under this article to drive a motorcycle and is in close proximity to the driver while the minor is driving. In addition, the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who is authorized pursuant to this section to supervise the minor driver while the minor is driving, may allow the minor, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, to drive with an individual who holds a valid driver's license and is twenty-one years of age or older for additional driving experience, but such additional driving experience shall not count toward the requirement established in section 42-2-104. The permit shall also entitle the applicant to drive a motor vehicle, including a motorcycle, that is marked to indicate that it is a motor vehicle used for instruction and that is properly equipped for instruction, upon the highways when accompanied by or under the supervision of an approved driver education instructor who holds a valid Colorado driver's license. Driver education instructors giving instruction in motorcycle safety shall have a valid motorcycle driver's license from Colorado and shall have successfully completed an instruction program in motorcycle safety approved by the department. The permit shall expire three years after issuance.

If the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who signed the affidavit of liability pursuant to section 42-2-108 (1)(a), does not hold a valid Colorado driver's license, the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent may appoint an alternate permit supervisor. An alternate permit supervisor shall hold a valid Colorado driver's license and be twenty-one years of age or older or, if the vehicle is a motorcycle, is authorized under this article to drive a motorcycle. A minor who is issued a permit under this paragraph (b) may drive a motor vehicle, including a motorcycle, under the supervision of the alternate permit supervisor if the minor has the permit in the minor's immediate possession and the alternate permit supervisor occupies the front seat of the motor vehicle or, if the vehicle is a motorcycle, is in close proximity to the driver.

If the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who signed the affidavit of liability pursuant to section 42-2-108 (1)(a), does not hold a valid Colorado driver's license but holds a valid driver's license from another state and is authorized to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle and has proper military identification, then the applicant, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, shall be authorized to drive a motor vehicle, including a motorcycle, under the supervision of the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who cosigned the application for the minor's instruction permit, if the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent occupies the front seat of the motor vehicle or, if the vehicle is a motorcycle, is in close proximity to the driver while the minor is driving.

A person sixteen years of age or older who, except for his or her lack of instruction in operating a motorcycle would otherwise be qualified to obtain a driver's license under this article to drive a motorcycle may apply for a temporary instruction permit, pursuant to sections 42-2-107 and 42-2-108. The department shall issue the permit entitling the applicant, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, to drive a motorcycle upon the highways while under the immediate supervision of a licensed driver, who holds a valid Colorado driver's license and is twenty-one years of age or older, authorized under this article to drive a motorcycle. The permit shall expire three years after issuance.

A minor fifteen and one-half years of age but less than sixteen years of age who has completed a four-hour prequalification driver awareness program approved by the department may apply for a minor's instruction permit pursuant to sections 42-2-107 and 42-2-108. Upon presenting a written or printed statement signed by the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent of the applicant and documentation that the minor completed the driver awareness program, the department shall issue a permit entitling the applicant, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, to drive a motor vehicle, including a motorcycle, under the supervision of the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who cosigned the application for the minor's instruction permit, if the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent holds a valid Colorado driver's license and occupies the front seat of the motor vehicle or, if the vehicle is a motorcycle, is authorized under this article to drive a motorcycle and is in close proximity to the driver while he or she is driving. In addition, the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who is authorized pursuant to this section to supervise the minor driver while the minor is driving, may allow the minor, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, to drive with an individual who holds a valid driver's license and is twenty-one years of age or older for additional driving experience, but such additional driving experience shall not count toward the requirement established in section 42-2-104. The permit shall expire three years after issuance.

If the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who signed the affidavit of liability pursuant to section 42-2-108 (1)(a), does not hold a valid Colorado driver's license, the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent may appoint an alternate permit supervisor. An alternate permit supervisor shall hold a valid Colorado driver's license and be twenty-one years of age or older or, if the vehicle is a motorcycle, is authorized under this article to drive a motorcycle. A minor who is issued a permit under this paragraph (d) may drive a motor vehicle, including a motorcycle, under the supervision of the alternate permit supervisor if the minor has the permit in the minor's immediate possession and the alternate permit supervisor occupies the front seat of the motor vehicle or, if the vehicle is a motorcycle, is in close proximity to the driver.

If the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who signed the affidavit of liability pursuant to section 42-2-108 (1)(a), does not hold a valid Colorado driver's license but holds a valid driver's license from another state and is authorized to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle and has proper military identification, then the applicant, while having the permit in the applicant's immediate possession, shall be authorized to drive a motor vehicle, including a motorcycle, under the supervision of the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent, who cosigned the application for the minor's instruction permit, if the parent, stepparent, grandparent with power of attorney, or guardian or foster parent occupies the front seat of the motor vehicle or, if the vehicle is a motorcycle, is in close proximity to the driver while the minor is driving.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection (1), a temporary instruction permit to operate a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 42-2-402 shall expire one year after issuance.

A person who qualifies for a permit under subsection (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), or (1)(d) of this section and who has a disability that requires the person to use a special vehicle or qualifies the person for parking privileges under section 42-3-204 may apply for an instruction permit in accordance with the subsection under which the person qualifies for a permit. Upon determining that a person is qualified for the permit, the department shall issue a permit entitling an applicant to drive a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon the highways in accordance with the requirements of the subsection under which the person qualifies for the permit and any further requirements the department may reasonably require due to the person's disability. The permit expires three years after issuance.

Notwithstanding subsections (1)(b) to (1)(d) of this section, a foster child, to obtain an instruction permit under subsections (1)(b) to (1)(d) of this section, may drive with any person who:

Holds a valid driver's license;

Is at least twenty-one years of age; and

Occupies the front passenger seat, in close proximity to the foster child, for the purposes of instruction.

The department, in its discretion, may issue a temporary driver's license to an applicant, who is not a first time applicant in Colorado or who is under eighteen years of age and is accompanied by a responsible party meeting the requirements of section 42-2-108 (1), for a minor driver's or driver's license which will permit such applicant to operate a motor vehicle while the department completes its verification of all facts relative to such applicant's right to receive a minor driver's or driver's license.

The department shall issue a temporary driver's license to a first time applicant in Colorado for a minor driver's or driver's license that will permit such applicant to operate a motor vehicle while the department completes its verification of all facts relative to such applicant's right to receive a minor driver's or driver's license including the age, identity, and residency of the applicant, unless such applicant is under eighteen years of age and is accompanied by a responsible adult meeting the requirements of section 42-2-108 (1). Such verification shall include a comparison of existing driver's license and identification card images in department files with the applicant's images to ensure such applicant has only one identity.

A temporary license is valid for up to one year as determined by the department, unless extended by the department, and must be in such applicant's immediate possession while operating a motor vehicle. It shall be invalid when the permanent license has been issued or has been refused for good cause.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2118, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1355, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 1380, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 1348, § 12, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2001:

(2) amended, p. 937, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended and (1)(d) and (1)(e) added, p. 1265, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d) amended, p. 641, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

(1)(b) and (1)(d) amended, p. 582, § 1, effective April 24; (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d) amended, p. 733, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1)(b)(I) amended, p. 589, § 3, effective April 20.

L. 2008:

(1)(f) added, p. 474, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1262, § 24, effective October 1.

L. 2010:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 10-1059), ch. 38, p. 156, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2017:

(1)(g) added, (SB 17-286), ch. 388, p. 2007, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1)(h) added, (HB 19-1023), ch. 239, p. 2364, § 4, effective August 2.